Utah statutes.
9-3-406.   Officer or employee -- No forfeiture of office or employment.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, no officer or employee of this state shall be deemed to have forfeited or shall forfeit his office or employment by reason of his acceptance of membership on the authority or his service on it.

